Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5868.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 2.08.063 and 2024 c 112 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:There shall be in the county of Lincoln one judge of the superior court; in the county of Skagit, ((four))five judges of the superior court; in the county of Walla Walla, two judges of the superior court; in the county of Whitman, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Yakima, ((eight))nine judges of the superior court; in the county of Adams, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Whatcom, five judges of the superior court.--- END ---